Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1641
Employee; termination of employment; notice; contents.

Not later than ten days following the date of termination of employment of the employee, the employer shall send a notice by certified mail with return receipt requested to the terminated employee at his or her home address as shown on the records of the employer. Such notice shall set forth (1) the right of the terminated employee to elect to continue coverage in accordance with section 44-1640 and the election form to be used in exercising such right, (2) the amount of each monthly premium to be paid by the terminated employee, and (3) the manner, time, and to whom the election form shall be completed and returned and each monthly premium shall be paid.

Laws 1989, LB 318, § 2.